Wyoming, session 2026, SF0009.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-7-1036(a) and by creating a new
subsection (c) is amended to read:
35-7-1036. Distribution to person under 18; drug free
school zones.
(a) Any person eighteen (18) years of age or over who
violates W.S. 35-7-1031(a) by distributing methamphetamine
or a controlled substance listed in Schedules I or II which
is a narcotic drug to a person under eighteen (18) years of
age who is at least three (3) years his junior is
punishable by the fine authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(i),
by a term of imprisonment of up to twice that authorized by
W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(i), or both. Except as provided in
subsection (c) of this section, any person eighteen (18)
years of age or over who violates W.S. 35-7-1031(a) by
distributing any other controlled substance listed in
Schedules I, II, III, to a person under eighteen (18) years
of age who is at least three (3) years his junior is
punishable by the fine authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(ii),
by a term of imprisonment up to twice that authorized by
W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(ii), or both. Any person eighteen (18)
years of age or over who violates W.S. 35-7-1031(a) by
distributing any controlled substance listed in Schedule IV
to a person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at
least three (3) years his junior is punishable by the fine
authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(iii), by a term of
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 13, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
imprisonment up to twice that authorized by W.S.
35-7-1031(a)(iii), or both. Any person eighteen (18) years
of age or over who violates W.S. 35-7-1031(a) by
distributing any controlled substance listed in Schedule V
to a person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at
least three (3) years his junior is punishable by the fine
authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(iv), by a term of
imprisonment up to twice that authorized by W.S.
35-7-1031(a)(iv), or both.
(c) Any person who is at least eighteen (18) years of
age who violates W.S. 35-7-1031(a) by distributing fentanyl
to a person under eighteen (18) years of age is guilty of a
felony punishable by the fine authorized by W.S.
35-7-1031(a)(ii), by a term of imprisonment up to twice
that authorized by W.S. 35-7-1031(a)(ii), or both. As used
in this subsection, "fentanyl" includes fentanyl and any
isomer, ester, ether, salt and salt of isomers, esters and
ethers of fentanyl, whenever the existence of these
isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the
specific chemical designation of fentanyl.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 13, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3